src/fst/morphology/stems/demonstratives.lexc
LEXICON dem
+Dem: # ;

LEXICON demloc
+Dem+Loc: # ;

LEXICON Demonstratives 
0:bukka dem ;
0:kunekke dem ;
0:kunu dem ;
0:makka dem ;
0:manekke dem ;
0:mani dem ;
0:namekke dem ;
0:ngalbu dem ;

LEXICON DemonstrativeLocatives
0:kondah demloc ;
0:kamekke demloc ;
